Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2774YH (3) 91 je/js H.F. 738 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 231.81 Centralized accommodation 1 grant program. 2 1. The department shall establish and administer a 3 centralized accommodation grant program. The program shall 4 provide grants to individuals with disabilities and employers 5 thereof for the purposes of funding repairs to mobility devices 6 and improving accessibility of workplaces. 7 2. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 8 to administer the program, including but not limited to rules 9 establishing eligibility requirements, an application process, 10 and award criteria. 11 3. A centralized accommodation fund is created in the 12 state treasury under the control of the department. The fund 13 shall consist of all moneys deposited in the fund pursuant to 14 section 602.8108, subsection 12, and appropriations made to the 15 fund. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department 16 for purposes of the centralized accommodation grant program. 17 Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 18 earnings on moneys deposited in the fund shall be credited to 19 the fund. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys credited to the 20 fund shall not revert at the close of a fiscal year. 21 Sec. 2. Section 602.8108, Code 2025, is amended by adding 22 the following new subsection: 23 NEW SUBSECTION . 12. The state court administrator shall 24 allocate all of the fines and fees attributable to citations 25 for violations under section 321L.2A, subsections 2 and 3, 26 section 321L.3, section 321L.4, subsection 2, and section 27 321L.7 to the treasurer of state for deposit in the centralized 28 accommodation fund created in section 231.81. 29 Sec. 3. Section 602.8108A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 30 amended to read as follows: 31 1. The Iowa prison infrastructure fund is created and 32 established as a separate and distinct fund in the state 33 treasury. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter 34 to the contrary, the first eight million dollars and, beginning 35 -1- LSB 2774YH (3) 91 je/js 1/ 3 H.F. 738 July 1, 1997, the first nine million five hundred thousand 1 dollars, of moneys remitted to the treasurer of state from 2 fines, fees, costs, and forfeited bail collected by the clerks 3 of the district court in criminal cases, including those 4 collected for both scheduled and nonscheduled violations, 5 collected in each fiscal year commencing with the fiscal 6 year beginning July 1, 1995, shall be deposited in the fund. 7 Beginning July 1, 2009, the treasurer of state shall certify 8 to the judicial branch the annual amount of funds necessary 9 to be remitted for deposit into the fund for that fiscal year 10 and such moneys shall be remitted to the treasurer of state 11 from fines, fees, costs, and forfeited bail collected by the 12 clerks of the district court in criminal cases, including those 13 collected for both scheduled and nonscheduled violations, for 14 debt payments expected to be paid from the fund. Interest 15 and other income earned by the fund shall be deposited in 16 the fund. However, beginning with the fiscal year beginning 17 July 1, 1998, all fines and fees attributable to commercial 18 vehicle violation citations issued after July 1, 1998, shall 19 be deposited as provided in section 602.8108, subsection 20 8 . Additionally, beginning with the fiscal year beginning 21 July 1, 2025, all fines and fees attributable to citations 22 for violations under section 321L.2A, subsections 2 and 3, 23 section 321L.3, section 321L.4, subsection 2, and section 24 321L.7 issued on or after July 1, 2025, shall be deposited as 25 provided in section 602.8108, subsection 12. The moneys in the 26 fund are appropriated and shall have priority and precedence 27 for the purpose of paying the principal of, premium, if any, 28 and interest on bonds issued by the Iowa finance authority 29 under section 16.177 . Any remaining moneys not otherwise 30 appropriated for purposes of paying the principal, premium, 31 and interest on the bonds issued by the Iowa finance authority 32 pursuant to section 16.177 shall be available and appropriated 33 to the treasurer of state pursuant to section 12.80 . Except 34 as otherwise provided in subsection 2 , amounts in the funds 35 -2- LSB 2774YH (3) 91 je/js 2/ 3 H.F. 738 shall not be subject to appropriation for any purpose by the 1 general assembly, but shall be used only for the purposes set 2 forth in this section . The treasurer of state shall act as 3 custodian of the fund and disburse amounts contained in it 4 as directed by the department of corrections including the 5 automatic disbursement of funds pursuant to the terms of bond 6 indentures and documents and security provisions to trustees 7 and custodians. The treasurer of state is authorized to invest 8 the funds deposited in the fund subject to any limitations 9 contained in any applicable bond proceedings. Any amounts 10 remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall be 11 transferred to the general fund of the state. 12